Hawaii statutes.
§556-10 Cases not provided for in chapter.
In any case not provided for in this chapter the rules of law and equity,
including the law merchant and those rules of law and equity relating to
trusts, agency, negotiable instruments, and banking, shall continue to apply.
[L 1945, c 197, §12; RL 1955, §189-11; HRS §556-10]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next